Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-213 Denial of charter or
license. If the commissioner is not satisfied that the applicant meets all
the criteria set forth for approval of the charter or license, the commissioner
shall issue a written decision denying the applicant's application. An
applicant who is denied approval may request a hearing before the commissioner
in accordance with chapter 91. Any final decision of the commissioner denying
an applicant a charter or license may be appealed to the circuit court as
provided in chapter 91. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Appeals, see HRCP rule 72.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next